Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 4. Marshalling Assets

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 649-676, 914-940, 942-983, 985-987; 53 Am. Jur. 2d Marshaling Assets § 1 et seq.

Modern status of jurisdiction of federal courts, under 28 U.S.C. § 1332(a), of diversity actions affecting probate or other matters concerning administration of decedents' estates, 61 ALR Fed 536.

33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 152 to 162.

§ 2-7-401.
Personal representative entitled to possession of all property; duty to repair; actions by heirs for possession or to quiet title.

The personal representative is entitled to possession of all real and personal estate of the decedent, and to receive the rents and profits of the real estate until the estate is settled or until delivery by order of the court to the heirs or beneficiaries. He shall keep in good repair all houses, buildings and fixtures under his control. The heirs or beneficiaries may themselves or jointly with the personal representative maintain an action for possession of the real estate or for quieting title to the same, against anyone except the personal representative, but this section shall not be so construed as requiring them to do so.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4688; C.S. 1910, § 5556; C.S. 1920, § 6829; R.S. 1931, § 88-2309; C.S. 1945, § 6-1309; W.S. 1957, § 2-161; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-709; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Administrator may bring action to quiet title

to irrigation ditch rights, particularly in view of this section, which provides that he may so maintain such an action. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

And heirs may be allowed to intervene. —

Under this section, providing that heirs may separately or jointly with administrator or executor bring action to quiet title, a court in an administrator's action to quiet title to water rights would not be powerless to permit the heirs to intervene, at least where administrator consents. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Surviving spouse held proper party in ejectment action. —

This section does not purport to limit an action for the recovery of real property against the executor or administrator alone, and a widow occupying mortgaged premises and claiming it as a homestead in her individual capacity, and not as executrix, is a proper party defendant to an ejectment action; failure to join her as executrix is at most a defect of parties waived by failure to raise the question in the trial court either by demurrer (now motion to dismiss) or answer. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Recovery of rents and profits of land held in trust. —

Under this section, executrix and ancillary administratrix were entitled to recover rents and profits of land held in trust for decedent pending settlement of the estate. Cook v. Elmore, 25 Wyo. 393, 171 P. 261,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1918).

Tenant estopped from questioning title. —

Tenant of deceased landlord, when sued by administrator for possession, is estopped as against administrator from questioning landlord's title, especially where tenant attorned to administrator. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

Estate liable for income tax in year of distribution. —

Under provisions providing executor or administrator shall receive and account for all income of estate where testator dies without providing for disposition of income of estate, residue of estate being distributed to residuary legatee under decree in August, 1937, the 1937 income which was subject to federal income tax was held taxable to estate and not to residuary legatee. Whitaker v. United States, 44 F. Supp. 484, 1941 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2244 (D. Wyo. 1941).

Quoted

in

Landen v. Production Credit Ass'n, 737 P.2d 1325,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights and liabilities of personal representatives with respect to completion of improvements, 5 ALR2d 1250.

Power of personal representative to repair personal property of estate, 64 ALR2d 857.

§ 2-7-402.
Title to decedent's property; subject to administration and payment of debts; priorities.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, when a person dies the title to his property, real and personal, passes to the person to whom it is devised by his last will, or in the absence of such disposition to the persons who succeed to his estate as provided in this code. However all of his property is subject to the possession of the personal representative and to the control of the court for the purposes of administration, sale or other disposition under the provisions of law, and his property, except homestead and other exempt property, is chargeable with the payment of debts and charges against his estate. There is no priority between real and personal property, except as provided in this code or by the will of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Jones, 770 P.2d 1100,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Norman v. Schulte, 107 B.R. 763, 1989 Bankr. LEXIS 2000 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1989);

George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-7-403.
Return of inventory of estate by representative; failure to comply; disposition of fines.

Every personal representative shall make and return to the court within one hundred twenty (120) days after his appointment a true inventory upon his oath, of all the estate of the decedent, including the homestead, if any, which has come to his possession or knowledge. If the personal representative does not file such inventory within one hundred twenty (120) days, he shall show the court good cause for his delay and the court shall determine whether or not an extension of time shall be allowed. For failure to comply in good faith with the time limitations set forth, the personal representative shall be adjudged in contempt of court, and a fine imposed and other enforcement entered as the court in its discretion determines. Any fine assessed shall be paid into the corpus of the estate.

Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in all cases to which W.S.

2-5-101

applies, the inventory shall be filed not more than seventy-five (75) days after the will has been admitted to probate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4680; C.S. 1910, § 5548; C.S. 1920, § 6821; R.S. 1931, § 88-2301; Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-1301; Laws 1949, ch. 75, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 2-153; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-701; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duty of appraisers to appraise and divide homestead, see §

2-7-507

.

As to inventory and appraisement when executor is sole legatee, see §

2-11-301

.

Time requirement not to be overlooked. —

In light of §§

2-2-201

and

2-2-202

, the requirement that an administrator must make and return a true inventory and appraisement within a reasonable time (now 120 days) cannot be lightly overlooked. In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

But proceedings not void if failure to comply. —

If the legislature had intended the failure of compliance with this section to render void all proceedings taken by the administrator, there would have been no occasion for the passage of §

2-7-409

.In re Estate of Patrick, 397 P.2d 273,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1964).

Removal of personal representative. —

Executors were not subject to removal where they did not file an inventory until eight months after the probate of the will, but a statement, substantially an inventory, was submitted to the heirs after the funeral of the deceased and a similar statement was filed with the petition for probate of the will. In re Estate of Hartt, 75 Wyo. 305, 295 P.2d 985,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1956). See §

2-7-409

.

Filing not a proper inventory. —

District court filing entitled “Inventory and Appraisement” did not qualify to be an inventory of all assets as contemplated by this section because it was an appraisal of a single residence owned by the decedent.
Hibsman v. Mullen (In re Estate of Hibsman), 287 P.3d 757, 2012 WY 139,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Oct 31, 2012).

Probate court has power to order correction of inventory.

Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933).

Cited in

Hibsman v. State, 2015 WY 122,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Sept. 15, 2015).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-7-404.
Report of appraisal; verification of values of estate assets.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days after the timely filing by the personal representative of the inventory of assets of the estate of the decedent, pursuant to W.S.

2-7-403

, the personal representative shall file under oath a report of appraisal of values of estate assets listed in the inventory. The report shall be in compliance with such of the following requirements as may be applicable:

As to all assets listed in the inventory which have a readily determinable market value, the value of each asset as of date of death shall be stated in writing by one (1) disinterested person;

As to all assets listed in the inventory that do not have a readily determinable market value, the personal representative shall employ disinterested persons to determine the fair market value of each such asset, as of the date of death. A separate written report as to the value of each asset, showing the appraiser’s basis for arriving at the value, shall be attached to the report.

Different persons may be employed to appraise or determine the value of different assets included in the estate.

The report, with any attachments required by this section, shall be filed with the clerk of court.

The amount of the fee to be paid to any appraiser, or any person making the required statement, shall be within the discretion of the personal representative, subject only to the provisions of W.S. 2-7-802(a) as to reasonableness and approval at the hearing of the final report and accounting of the personal representative.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4681; C.S. 1910, § 5549; C.S. 1920, § 6822; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 126; R.S. 1931, § 88-2302; C.S. 1945, § 6-1302; W.S. 1957, § 2-154; Laws 1967, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-702; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2; 1985, ch. 15, § 1.

Filing and verification of inventory required. —

An executor or administrator is required to file an inventory of the property of the estate and to subscribe an oath that it contains a true statement of all the estate of the decedent including claims the decedent may have had against the executor or administrator. Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933) (decided under former § 2-7-406).

Cited

in

TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994); Hibsman v. State, 2015 WY 122,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Sept. 15, 2015).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§§ 2-7-405 and 2-7-406.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 15, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to appraisers, see §

2-7-404

.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

As to right of personal representative to information as to affairs of partnership of which decedent was member, see §

17-21-403

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, §§ 3, 6, related to oaths of appraisers and form, signing, verification, and filing of appraisements.

§ 2-7-407.
Effect of naming debtor as personal representative.

The naming of a debtor as personal representative does not discharge him from any just claim which the testator has against him. The claim shall be included in the inventory and the personal representative is liable for the same when the debt or demand becomes due.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4683; C.S. 1910, § 5551; C.S. 1920, § 6824; R.S. 1931, § 88-2304; C.S. 1945, § 6-1304; W.S. 1957, § 2-156; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-704; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Section modifies common law. —

At common law the appointment of one's debtor as executor was held to extinguish the debt. Since a man could not give his property away to the prejudice of his creditors, it was further held that, if necessary for the payment of the debts of the testator, the antecedent debt of an executor could be reached in equity. But the main rule was early disapproved in the United States, and statutes were enacted in many jurisdictions to abolish it. That situation is true in Wyoming, which enacted this section. State Use of Frederick v. Allen, 42 Wyo. 290, 42 Wyo. 296, 294 P. 681,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1930).

This section was enacted for the sole purpose of changing the common-law rule as to an executor-debtor and to make certain that the common-law rule controlling administrators and other trustees, whereby the assets would be available to the persons entitled thereto, would be applied to executors. State Use of Frederick v. Allen, 42 Wyo. 290, 42 Wyo. 296, 294 P. 681,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1930).

§ 2-7-408.
Discharge or bequest of debt or demand not valid against creditors.

The discharge or bequest in a will of any debt or demand of the testator against the personal representative named or any other person is not valid against the creditors of the decedent, but is a specific bequest of the debt or demand. It shall be included in the inventory and if necessary applied in the payment of the debts. If not necessary for that purpose, it shall be paid in the same manner and proportion as other specific legacies.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4684; C.S. 1910, § 5552; C.S. 1920, § 6825; R.S. 1931, § 88-2305; C.S. 1945, § 6-1305; W.S. 1957, § 2-157; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-705; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-409.
Failure to file inventory or appraisement.

If a personal representative neglects or refuses to file either the inventory or appraisement within the time prescribed or within such further time which the court shall for reasonable cause allow, the court or commissioner may, upon notice, in addition to all other remedies and penalties provided in this code, revoke the letters and the personal representative is liable on his bond for any injury to the estate or rights of any person interested therein arising from such failure.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4686; C.S. 1910, § 5554; C.S. 1920, § 6827; R.S. 1931, § 88-2307; Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 6-1307; W.S. 1957, § 2-159; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-707; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to return of inventory and filing of appraisement of estate, see §§

2-7-403

and

2-7-404

.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Discretion of court. —

Whether the cause shown, as provided for in this section, be good or bad is a matter largely within the discretion of the trial court; when that court has investigated the question and adjudicated upon it, it will only be where a gross abuse of discretion has occurred that the supreme court will interfere. In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

Where the administrator had neither made nor returned a true inventory or appraisement within a period of ample time to have done so, and had presented no reasonable excuse for his failure to comply with the law, there was no abuse of discretion in the district court entering an order to remove him. In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

Removal of executor requires stronger showing than for removalof administrator. —

Generally speaking, removal of an executor requires a stronger showing than the removal of an administrator, weight being given to the maxim, “Whom the testator will trust, so will the law.” In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-7-410.
Appraisement of after-discovered property; filing; enforcement.

Whenever property not mentioned in any inventory comes to the possession or knowledge of the personal representative, he shall cause the same to be appraised in the manner prescribed and an appraisement thereof filed within one (1) month after the discovery. The making of the appraisement may be enforced, after notice, by any and all remedies provided by this code.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 11, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4687; C.S. 1910, § 5555; C.S. 1920, § 6828; R.S. 1931, § 88-2308; Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 6-1308; W.S. 1957, § 2-160; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-708; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Probate court has power to order and enforce correction of inventory.

Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-7-411.
Liability for embezzlement or alienation of monies before letters granted.

If any person, before the granting of letters embezzles or alienates any of the monies, goods, chattels or effects of a decedent he is chargeable therewith and liable to an action by the personal representative of the estate for double the value of the property embezzled or alienated, for the benefit of the estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 12, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4689; C.S. 1910, § 5557; C.S. 1920, § 6830; R.S. 1931, § 88-2401; C.S. 1945, § 6-1401; W.S. 1957, § 2-162; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-710; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to defaulting fiduciaries, see §

2-3-127

et seq.

As to penalty for administering estate without proving will or taking out letters, see §

2-7-102

.

As to examination of person suspected of defrauding wards or concealing property, in connection with guardian and ward, see §

3-1-104

.

Alienation of property must be wrongful. —

Person to be subject to statutory liability for “alienating” property of estate must have wrongfully transferred the property. Delfelder v. Poston, 42 Wyo. 176, 293 P. 354,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1930).

No liability in good faith purchase. —

Where defendants purchased mortgaged property of deceased in good faith before administration, resulting in reduction of mortgage in excess of value of property, they were not liable for double damages. Delfelder v. Poston, 42 Wyo. 176, 293 P. 354,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1930).

Relation to other law. —

Person who was appointed to administer a decedent's estate established that she had liquidated damages in the amount of $ 74,071 against a Chapter 13 debtor who was originally appointed to administer the decedent's estate, and that she was entitled to seek twice that amount under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

2-7-411

and 2-7-413(b) based on her claim that the debtor stole money from the estate, and when the resulting amount of $ 148,143 was added to the figure of $ 184,456 the debtor and another debtor claimed as unsecured debt, the sum exceeded the threshold amount set by 11 U.S.C.S. § 109(e) for obtaining relief under Chapter 13 of the Bankruptcy Code. As such, the bankruptcy court erred when it overruled the administrator's objection to the debtors'
plan for paying their creditors.
Kanke v. Adams (In re Adams), 373 B.R. 116, 2007 Bankr. LEXIS 3335 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Penal or remedial nature of statutes imposing liability for double the value of property of decedent embezzled, alienated, converted, or the like, before granting of administration or letters testamentary, 29 A.L.R.2d 244.

§ 2-7-412.
Citation to persons suspected of having concealed monies; generally.

If any personal representative or other person interested in the estate of a decedent complains to the court in writing, verified by oath, that any person is suspected of having concealed, embezzled, smuggled, conveyed away or disposed of any monies, goods or chattels of the decedent or in which he had an interest, or has in his possession or knowledge any deeds, conveyances, bonds, contracts or other writings which contain evidence of or tend to disclose the right, title, interest or claim of the decedent to any real or personal estate or any claim or demand, or any lost will, the court shall cite the person to appear before the court and shall examine him on oath upon the matter of the complaint. If the person is not in the county where the decedent died or where letters have been granted he may be cited and examined either before the court of the county where he is found or before the court of the county where the decedent died or where letters have been granted. But if in the latter case he appears and is found innocent his necessary expenses shall be allowed him out of the estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 12, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4690; C.S. 1910, § 5558; C.S. 1920, § 6831; R.S. 1931, § 88-2402; C.S. 1945, § 6-1402; W.S. 1957, § 2-163; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-711; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to defaulting fiduciaries generally, see §

2-3-136

et seq.

For duty of custodian to deliver will to court or executor, see §

2-6-119

.

As to examination of persons suspected of defrauding wards or concealing property, in connection with guardian and ward, see §

3-1-104

.

Application for order for examination as to assets must be filed

and time for objection allowed. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

But failure to file held not to warrant prohibition. —

Failure to file application for order held not to warrant issuance of writ of prohibition by supreme court. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

Hardship held not controlling issue in prohibition. —

Hardship on petitioners in submitting to examination has been held not controlling in issuance of writ of prohibition. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

Notice given by citation. —

Section

2-2-306

, providing for giving of notice by citation, is applicable in a proceeding under this section requiring persons believed to be in possession of a decedent's property to submit to examination touching such property, since no mode as to giving notice is provided. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

Objection to service

should be made in lower court. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

And to jurisdiction. —

Failure to object to jurisdiction is not excused because proceedings were ex parte. State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

Cited in

Hibsman v. Mullen (In re Estate of Hibsman), 2012 WY 139,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Oct 31, 2012).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-7-413.
Citation to persons suspected of having concealed monies; failure to appear or answer; disclosure order; proceedings generally.

If the person cited refuses to appear and submit to an examination or to answer interrogatories put to him touching the matters of complaint, the court may commit him to the county jail until he submits to the order of the court or is discharged according to law. If upon examination it appears that he has concealed, embezzled, smuggled, conveyed away or disposed of any monies, goods or chattels of the decedent or has in his possession or knowledge any deeds, conveyances, bonds, contracts or other writings containing evidence of or tending to disclose the right, title, interest or claim of the decedent to any real or personal estate, claim or demand, or any lost will of the decedent, an order may be made requiring the person to disclose his knowledge thereof to the personal representative and he may be committed to the county jail until the order is complied with or he is discharged according to law.

All interrogatories and answers shall be in writing, signed by the party examined and filed in the court. The order for disclosure made upon the examination is prima facie evidence of the right of the personal representative to the property in any action brought for the recovery thereof. Any judgment recovered shall be for double the value of the property as assessed by the court, or for return of the property and damages in addition thereto equal to the value of the property. In addition to the examination of the party, witnesses may be produced and examined on either side.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 12, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4691; C.S. 1910, § 5559; C.S. 1920, § 6832; R.S. 1931, § 88-2403; C.S. 1945, § 6-1403; W.S. 1957, § 2-164; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-712; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to examination of persons suspected of defrauding wards or concealing property, in connection with guardian and ward, see §

3-1-104

.

Relation to other law. —

Person who was appointed to administer a decedent's estate established that she had liquidated damages in the amount of $ 74,071 against a Chapter 13 debtor who was originally appointed to administer the decedent's estate, and that she was entitled to seek twice that amount under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

2-7-411

and 2-7-413(b) based on her claim that the debtor stole money from the estate, and when the resulting amount of $ 148,143 was added to the figure of $ 184,456 the debtor and another debtor claimed as unsecured debt, the sum exceeded the threshold amount set by 11 U.S.C.S. § 109(e) for obtaining relief under Chapter 13 of the Bankruptcy Code. As such, the bankruptcy court erred when it overruled the administrator's objection to the debtors'
plan for paying their creditors.
Kanke v. Adams (In re Adams), 373 B.R. 116, 2007 Bankr. LEXIS 3335 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2007).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

, 35 A.L.R. 1082 (1924).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-7-414.
Citation of persons entrusted with monies for accounting.

Upon the complaint on oath of any personal representative, the court shall cite any person who has been entrusted with any part of the estate of the decedent to appear before the court and require him to render a full account of any monies, goods, chattels, bonds, accounts or other property or papers belonging to the estate which have come to his possession in trust for the personal representative, and of his proceedings thereon. If the person cited refuses to appear and render the account he shall be proceeded against as provided in W.S.

2-7-413

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 12, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4692; C.S. 1910, § 5560; C.S. 1920, § 6833; R.S. 1931, § 88-2404; C.S. 1945, § 6-1404; W.S. 1957, § 2-165; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-713; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to examination of persons suspected of defrauding wards or concealing property, in connection with guardian and ward, see §

3-1-104

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

, 35 A.L.R. 1082 (1924);
Hibsman v. Mullen (In re Estate of Hibsman), 2012 WY 139,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Oct 31, 2012).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.